North Dakota, session 69, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 16.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Registration of electors - Secretary of state to adopt rules .
1. A qualified elector shall register in the election precinct in which the elector resides to
be entitled to vote at any statewide special, primary, or general election.
2. A qualified elector may register by mail by submitting a completed registration form to
the county auditor at any time except during the thirty days before any statewide
special, primary, or general election.
3. Except during the thirty days before a statewide election, a qualified elector may
register to vote when:
a. Applying for or renewing a driver's license or nondriver's identification card;
b. Providing a notice of change of name or address on a driver's license or
nondriver's identification card; or
c. Applying for or receiving public assistance.
4. A qualified elector may register in person at the office of the county auditor by
completing a registration form at any time up to the day before a statewide special,
primary, or general election. If a qualified elector applies to the county auditor for an
absentee ballot or mail ballot, the elector may request a registration form and may
complete and submit the form with the ballot if the registration form is submitted by
mail within thirty days of the election.
Page No. 1 25.0427.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. An individual may register to vote on the day of an election by completing the
prescribed form and submitting the required information at the appropriate polling
place.
6. Upon receipt of a registration form, properly filled out and signed by the applicant, the
county auditor or authorized election officer shall register the individual as a qualified
elector in the central voter file.
7. The secretary of state shall prescribe the forms to be used for registration of qualified
electors which must include the qualified elector's name, address, date of birth, last
place of registration, and any other information the secretary of state determines to be
necessary to assure accurate and reliable qualified elector registration.
8. The director of the department of transportation shall cooperate with the secretary of
state to develop voter registration forms to be used with a driver's license or
nondriver's identification card application and renewal and a change of name and
address request.
9. A designation of political party affiliation may not be noted or indicated on the
registration form.
10. The secretary of state shall adopt rules and prescribe the forms to be used for transfer
of electors within the central voter file and the deletion of electors from the central
voter file.
11. Subject to rules adopted by the secretary of state, the registration of a qualified elector
is permanent.
Page No. 2 25.0427.01000